Nevada, session 83, SB390.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 425 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each district attorney or other public agency collecting
support for children shall send a notice by first-class mail to each
person who:
-
*SB390_R1*

– 3 –
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating
to a proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish
or enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children.
 The notice must include the information set forth in subsection
2 and a copy of the subpoena or warrant or a statement of the
amount of the arrearage.
2. If the person does not, within 30 days after the person
receives the notice required by subsection 1:
(a) Comply with the subpoena or warrant;
(b) Satisfy the arrearage pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 9; or
(c) Submit to the district attorney or other public agency a
written request for a hearing,
 the district attorney or other public agency may report the name
of that person to the Department of Motor Vehicles, unless the
suspension of the driver’s license and motorcycle driver’s license
of the person would be an impediment to his or her present or
potential employment.
3. Before a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 2 may
be held, the person requesting the hearing and a representative of
the enforcing authority must meet and make a good faith effort to
resolve the matter.
4. If a person requests a hearing within the period prescribed
in subsection 2 and meets with the enforcing authority as required
pursuant to subsection 3, a hearing must be held pursuant to NRS
425.3832. The master shall notify the person of the
recommendation of the master at the conclusion of the hearing or
as soon thereafter as is practicable. If the master determines that
the person has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant
relating to a proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to
establish or enforce an obligation for the support of a child, the
master shall include in the notice the information set forth in
subsection 5. If the master determines that the person is in arrears
in the payment for the support of one or more children, the master
shall include in the notice the information set forth in
subsection 6.
5. If the master determines that a person who requested a
hearing pursuant to subsection 2 has not complied with a
subpoena or warrant relating to a proceeding to determine the
paternity of a child or to establish or enforce an obligation for the
support of a child and the district court issues an order approving
the recommendation of the master, the district attorney or other
public agency may report the name of that person to the
-
*SB390_R1*

– 4 –
Department of Motor Vehicles, unless the suspension of the
driver’s license and motorcycle driver’s license of the person
would be an impediment to his or her present or potential
employment.
6. If the master determines that a person who requested a
hearing pursuant to subsection 2 is in arrears in the payment for
the support of one or more children, the master shall notify the
person that if the person does not immediately agree to enter into a
plan for the repayment of the arrearages that is approved by the
district attorney or other public agency, the driver’s license and
motorcycle driver’s license of the person may be subject to
suspension. If the person does not agree to enter into such a plan
and the district court issues an order approving the
recommendation of the master, the district attorney or other public
agency may report the name of that person to the Department of
Motor Vehicles, unless the suspension of the driver’s license and
motorcycle driver’s license of the person would be an impediment
to his or her present or potential employment.
7. The district attorney or other public agency shall, within 5
days after the person who has failed to comply with a subpoena or
warrant or is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or
more children complies with the subpoena or warrant or satisfies
the arrearage pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 9, notify the
Department of Motor Vehicles that the person has complied with
the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the arrearage.
8. Each district attorney or other public agency collecting
support for children shall:
(a) Collect and maintain basic demographic data, including,
without limitation, data relating to household income, concerning
each person to whom the district attorney or other public agency
has sent a notice pursuant to subsection 1 and each person whose
name is reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to
subsection 2.
(b) On or before January 30 of each year, compile a report
summarizing the data collected and maintained by the district
attorney or other public agency during the immediately preceding
year pursuant to paragraph (a).
(c) Transmit the report compiled pursuant to paragraph (b)
and the data collected and maintained by the district attorney or
other public agency during the immediately preceding year
pursuant to paragraph (a) to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
-
*SB390_R1*

– 5 –
(2) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Commerce and Labor.
9. For the purposes of this section:
(a) A person is in arrears in the payment for the support of one
or more children if the person:
(1) Is delinquent for not less than 3 months in payments for
the support of one or more children or any payments ordered by a
court for arrearages in such payments; or
(2) The person has failed to provide medical insurance for
a child as required by a court order.
(b) A person who is in arrears in the payment for the support
of one or more children may satisfy the arrearage by:
(1) Paying all of the past due payments;
(2) If the person is unable to pay all past due payments:
(I) Paying the amounts of the overdue payments for the
preceding 12 months which a court has determined are in arrears;
or
(II) Entering into and complying with a plan for the
repayment of the arrearages in installments which is approved by
the district attorney or other public agency enforcing the order; or
(3) If the arrearage is for a failure to provide and maintain
medical insurance, providing proof that the child is covered under
a policy, contract or plan of medical insurance.
(c) A person shall be deemed to have received a notice 3 days
after it is mailed, by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to that
person at the last known address of the person.
Sec. 2. NRS 425.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.365 1. The Administrator or the designee of the
Administrator is responsible for and shall supervise the Program,
subject to administrative supervision by the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
2. The Administrator may adopt such regulations and take such
actions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
3. The Administrator shall make every effort to obtain the
approval necessary from the United States Department of Health
and Human Services to ensure that the Program complies with all
requirements for the receipt of federal money under Part D of
Title IV of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 651 et seq.
Sec. 3. NRS 425.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.500 As used in NRS 425.500 to 425.560, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, “agency
that issues a professional, occupational or recreational license,
certificate or permit” means the Department of Wildlife and any
officer, agency, board or commission of this State which is
-
*SB390_R1*

– 6 –
prohibited by specific statute from issuing or renewing a license,
certificate or permit unless the applicant for the issuance or renewal
of that license, certificate or permit submits to the officer, agency,
board or commission the statement prescribed by the Division
pursuant to NRS 425.520.
Sec. 4. NRS 425.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.510 1. Each district attorney or other public agency
collecting support for children shall send a notice by first-class mail
to each person who:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish or
enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children.
 The notice must include the information set forth in subsection 2
and a copy of the subpoena or warrant or a statement of the amount
of the arrearage.
2. If the person does not, within 30 days after the person
receives the notice required by subsection 1:
(a) Comply with the subpoena or warrant;
(b) Satisfy the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560; or
(c) Submit to the district attorney or other public agency a
written request for a hearing,
 the district attorney or other public agency shall report the name
of that person to the [Department of Motor Vehicles and to the]
Department of Wildlife.
3. Before a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 2 may be
held, the person requesting the hearing and a representative of the
enforcing authority must meet and make a good faith effort to
resolve the matter.
4. If a person requests a hearing within the period prescribed in
subsection 2 and meets with the enforcing authority as required
pursuant to subsection 3, a hearing must be held pursuant to NRS
425.3832. The master shall notify the person of the recommendation
of the master at the conclusion of the hearing or as soon thereafter as
is practicable. If the master determines that the person has failed to
comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a proceeding to
determine the paternity of a child or to establish or enforce an
obligation for the support of a child, the master shall include in the
notice the information set forth in subsection 5. If the master
determines that the person is in arrears in the payment for the
support of one or more children, the master shall include in the
notice the information set forth in subsection 6.
5. If the master determines that a person who requested a
hearing pursuant to subsection 2 has not complied with a subpoena
-
*SB390_R1*

– 7 –
or warrant relating to a proceeding to determine the paternity of a
child or to establish or enforce an obligation for the support of a
child and the district court issues an order approving the
recommendation of the master, the district attorney or other public
agency shall report the name of that person to the [Department of
Motor Vehicles and to the] Department of Wildlife.
6. If the master determines that a person who requested a
hearing pursuant to subsection 2 is in arrears in the payment for the
support of one or more children, the master shall notify the person
that if the person does not immediately agree to enter into a plan for
the repayment of the arrearages that is approved by the district
attorney or other public agency, [the driver’s license and motorcycle
driver’s license of the person and] any license or permit to hunt, fish
or trap issued by the Department of Wildlife to the person pursuant
to chapters 502 and 503 of NRS, may be subject to suspension. If
the person does not agree to enter into such a plan and the district
court issues an order approving the recommendation of the master,
the district attorney or other public agency shall report the name of
that person to the [Department of Motor Vehicles and to the]
Department of Wildlife.
7. The district attorney or other public agency shall, within 5
days after the person who has failed to comply with a subpoena or
warrant or is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or
more children complies with the subpoena or warrant or satisfies the
arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560, notify the [Department of
Motor Vehicles] and the Department of Wildlife that the person has
complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the
arrearage.
8. For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to
have received a notice 3 days after it is mailed, by first-class mail,
postage prepaid, to that person at the last known address of the
person.
Sec. 5. NRS 425.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
425.560 [For] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of
this act, for the purposes of NRS 425.500 to 425.560, inclusive [:] ,
and section 1 of this act:
1. A person is in arrears in the payment for the support of one
or more children if:
(a) The person:
(1) Owes a total of more than $1,000 for the support of one
or more children for which payment is past due; and
(2) Is delinquent for not less than 2 months in payments for
the support of one or more children or any payments ordered by a
court for arrearages in such payments; or
-
*SB390_R1*

– 8 –
(b) The person has failed to provide medical insurance for a
child as required by a court order.
2. A person who is in arrears in the payment for the support of
one or more children may satisfy the arrearage by:
(a) Paying all of the past due payments;
(b) If the person is unable to pay all past due payments:
(1) Paying the amounts of the overdue payments for the
preceding 12 months which a court has determined are in arrears; or
(2) Entering into and complying with a plan for the
repayment of the arrearages which is approved by the district
attorney or other public agency enforcing the order; or
(c) If the arrearage is for a failure to provide and maintain
medical insurance, providing proof that the child is covered under a
policy, contract or plan of medical insurance.
Sec. 5.5. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 5.7. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 6. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB390_R1*